test/src/morphology/V-taxtu_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - taxtú leave: # Ordinary verb - full paradigm
     taxtú+V+Ind+Impf+Prs+1Sg: iˈktaxtú
     taxtú+V+Ind+Impf+Prs+2Sg: taxtúyaˈ
     taxtú+V+Ind+Impf+Prs+3Sg: taxtú
     taxtú+V+Ind+Impf+Prs+1Pl: iˈktaxtuyáːuj
     taxtú+V+Ind+Impf+Prs+12Pl: taxtúyáːuj
     taxtú+V+Ind+Impf+Prs+2Pl: taxtúyáːˈtít
     taxtú+V+Ind+Impf+Prs+3Pl: tataxtú
     
     taxtú+V+Ind+Impf+Prt+1Sg: xaˈktaxtú
     taxtú+V+Ind+Impf+Prt+2Sg: iˈxtaxtúyaˈ
     taxtú+V+Ind+Impf+Prt+3Sg: ixtaxtú
     taxtú+V+Ind+Impf+Prt+1Pl: xaˈktaxtuyáːuj
     taxtú+V+Ind+Impf+Prt+12Pl: iˈxtaxtuyáːuj
     taxtú+V+Ind+Impf+Prt+2Pl: iˈxtaxtuyaːˈtít
     taxtú+V+Ind+Impf+Prt+3Pl: iˈxtataxtú
     
     taxtú+V+Ind+Impf+Fut+1Sg: naˈktaxtú
     taxtú+V+Ind+Impf+Fut+2Sg: nataxtúyaˈ
     taxtú+V+Ind+Impf+Fut+3Sg: nataxtú
     taxtú+V+Ind+Impf+Fut+1Pl: naˈktaxtuyáːuj
     taxtú+V+Ind+Impf+Fut+12Pl: nataxtuyáːuj
     taxtú+V+Ind+Impf+Fut+2Pl: nataxtuyaːˈtít
     taxtú+V+Ind+Impf+Fut+3Pl: natataxtú

     taxtú+V+Opt+1Sg: kaˈtaxtú
     taxtú+V+Opt+2Sg: kataxtúyaˈ
     taxtú+V+Opt+3Sg: kataxtú
     taxtú+V+Opt+1Pl: kaˈktaxtuyáːuj
     taxtú+V+Opt+12Pl: kataxtúyáːuj
     taxtú+V+Opt+2Pl: kataxtúyáːˈtít
     taxtú+V+Opt+3Pl: katataxtú
     
     taxtú+V+Pot+1Sg: iˈktiˈtaxtú
     taxtú+V+Pot+2Sg: tiˈtaxtúyaˈ
     taxtú+V+Pot+3Sg: tiˈtaxtú
     taxtú+V+Pot+1Pl: iˈktiˈtaxtuyáːuj
     taxtú+V+Pot+12Pl: tiˈtaxtúyáːuj
     taxtú+V+Pot+2Pl: tiˈtaxtúyáːˈtít
     taxtú+V+Pot+3Pl: tiˈtataxtú
     
     taxtú+V+Irr+1Sg: xaˈktaxtúlh
     taxtú+V+Irr+2Sg: iˈxtáxtuˈ
     taxtú+V+Irr+3Sg: iˈxtaxtúlh
     taxtú+V+Irr+1Pl: xaˈktaxtúj
     taxtú+V+Irr+12Pl: iˈxtaxtúj
     taxtú+V+Irr+2Pl: iˈxtaxtuˈtít
     taxtú+V+Irr+3Pl: iˈxtataxtúlh
     
     taxtú+V+Ind+Imp+1Sg: itaxtú
     taxtú+V+Ind+Imp+2Sg: taxtúyaˈ
     taxtú+V+Ind+Imp+3Sg: taxtú
     taxtú+V+Ind+Imp+1Pl: iˈktaxtuyáːuj
     taxtú+V+Ind+Imp+12Pl: taxtúyáːuj
     taxtú+V+Ind+Imp+2Pl: taxtúyáːˈtít
     taxtú+V+Ind+Imp+3Pl: tataxtú
     
